Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-617.01
Nomination by petition filed with Secretary of State; form of petition.

In addition to the requirements of sections 32-617 and 32-619, if the Secretary of State is the filing officer for a petition for nomination for partisan and nonpartisan offices, the form of the petition shall be substantially as follows:

Petition for Office for General Election

Name of Candidate: ............

Residence Address: ............

City, State, and Zip Code: ............

Name of Office: ............

District (if applicable): ............

Party Affiliation (if applicable): ............

To the Honorable ............, Secretary of State for the State of Nebraska:

We, the undersigned residents of the State of Nebraska and the county of ............, respectfully demand that the above-named candidate be placed on the ballot at the general election to be held on the .... day of ......... 20...., and each for himself or herself says:

I have personally signed this petition on the date opposite my name;

I am a registered voter of the State of Nebraska and the county of ............ and am qualified to sign this petition or I will be so registered and qualified on or before the date on which this petition is filed with the Secretary of State; and

My printed name, date of birth, street and number or voting precinct, and city, village, or post office address are correctly written after my signature.

(Here follow numbered lines for signature, printed name, date of birth, date, street and number or voting precinct, and city, village, or post office address.)

Laws 2025, LB521, § 43.